Illinois, session 104th, SB1458.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Sections 10 and 70 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/10)7    Sec. 10. Issuance of licenses to carry a concealed 8firearm. 9    (a) The Illinois State Police shall issue a license to 10carry a concealed firearm under this Act to an applicant who:11        (1) meets the qualifications of Section 25 of this 12    Act;13        (2) has provided the application and documentation 14    required in Section 30 of this Act; 15        (3) has submitted the requisite fees; and16        (4) does not pose a danger to himself, herself, or 17    others, or a threat to public safety as determined by the 18    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board in accordance with 19    Section 20.20    (b) The Illinois State Police shall issue a renewal, 21corrected, or duplicate license as provided in this Act.22    (c) A license shall be valid throughout the State for a 23period of 5 years from the date of issuance. A license shall   SB1458- 2 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1permit the licensee to:2        (1) carry a loaded or unloaded concealed firearm, 3    fully concealed or partially concealed, on or about his or 4    her person; and 5        (2) keep or carry a loaded or unloaded concealed 6    firearm on or about his or her person within a vehicle; if 7    the licensee leaves his or her vehicle unattended, he or 8    she shall store the firearm out of plain view in a safe or 9    other secure container which, when locked, is incapable of 10    being opened without the key, keypad, combination, or 11    other unlocking mechanism and is capable of preventing an 12    unauthorized person from obtaining access to and 13    possession of the weapon contained therein and shall be 14    fire, impact, and tamper resistant. For the purposes of 15    this paragraph (2), a glove compartment, glove box, or 16    center console is not considered an appropriate safe or 17    secure storage container.18    (d) The Illinois State Police shall make applications for 19a license available no later than 180 days after July 9, 2013 20(the effective date of this Act). The Illinois State Police 21shall establish rules for the availability and submission of 22applications in accordance with this Act.23    (e) An application for a license submitted to the Illinois 24State Police that contains all the information and materials 25required by this Act, including the requisite fee, shall be 26deemed completed. Except as otherwise provided in this Act, no   SB1458- 3 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1later than 90 days after receipt of a completed application, 2the Illinois State Police shall issue or deny the applicant a 3license. The Illinois State Police shall notify the applicant 4for a concealed carry license electronically to confirm if all 5the required information and materials have been received. If 6an applicant for a concealed carry license submits his or her 7application electronically, the Illinois State Police shall 8notify the applicant electronically if his or her application 9is missing information or materials.10    (f) The Illinois State Police shall deny the applicant a 11license if the applicant fails to meet the requirements under 12this Act or the Illinois State Police receives a determination 13from the Board that the applicant is ineligible for a license. 14The Illinois State Police must notify the applicant stating 15the grounds for the denial. The notice of denial must inform 16the applicant of his or her right to an appeal through 17administrative and judicial review.18    (g) A licensee shall possess a license at all times the 19licensee carries a concealed firearm except:20        (1) when the licensee is carrying or possessing a 21    concealed firearm on his or her land or in his or her 22    abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or on 23    the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as an 24    invitee with that person's permission;25        (2) when the person is authorized to carry a firearm 26    under Section 24-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except   SB1458- 4 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    subsection (a-5) of that Section; or2        (3) when the handgun is broken down in a 3    non-functioning state, is not immediately accessible, or 4    is unloaded and enclosed in a case.5    (h) If an officer of a law enforcement agency initiates an 6investigative stop, including, but not limited to, a traffic 7stop, of a licensee or a non-resident carrying a concealed 8firearm under subsection (e) of Section 40 of this Act, upon 9the request of the officer the licensee or non-resident shall 10disclose to the officer that he or she is in possession of a 11concealed firearm under this Act, or present the license upon 12the request of the officer if he or she is a licensee or 13present upon the request of the officer evidence under 14paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 40 of this Act that 15he or she is a non-resident qualified to carry under that 16subsection. The disclosure requirement under this subsection 17(h) is satisfied if the licensee presents his or her license to 18the officer or the non-resident presents to the officer 19evidence under paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 40 20of this Act that he or she is qualified to carry under that 21subsection. Upon the request of the officer, the licensee or 22non-resident shall also identify the location of the concealed 23firearm and permit the officer to safely secure the firearm 24for the duration of the investigative stop. During a traffic 25stop, any passenger within the vehicle who is a licensee or a 26non-resident carrying under subsection (e) of Section 40 of   SB1458- 5 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1this Act must comply with the requirements of this subsection 2(h). 3    (h-1) If a licensee carrying a firearm or a non-resident 4carrying a firearm in a vehicle under subsection (e) of 5Section 40 of this Act is contacted by a law enforcement 6officer or emergency services personnel, the law enforcement 7officer or emergency services personnel may secure the firearm 8or direct that it be secured during the duration of the contact 9if the law enforcement officer or emergency services personnel 10determines that it is necessary for the safety of any person 11present, including the law enforcement officer or emergency 12services personnel. The licensee or nonresident shall submit 13to the order to secure the firearm. When the law enforcement 14officer or emergency services personnel have determined that 15the licensee or non-resident is not a threat to the safety of 16any person present, including the law enforcement officer or 17emergency services personnel, and if the licensee or 18non-resident is physically and mentally capable of possessing 19the firearm, the law enforcement officer or emergency services 20personnel shall return the firearm to the licensee or 21non-resident before releasing him or her from the scene and 22breaking contact. If the licensee or non-resident is 23transported for treatment to another location, the firearm 24shall be turned over to any peace officer. The peace officer 25shall provide a receipt which includes the make, model, 26caliber, and serial number of the firearm.   SB1458- 6 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    (i) The Illinois State Police shall maintain a database of 2license applicants and licensees. The database shall be 3available to all federal, State, and local law enforcement 4agencies, State's Attorneys, the Attorney General, and 5authorized court personnel. Within 180 days after July 9, 2013 6(the effective date of this Act), the database shall be 7searchable and provide all information included in the 8application, including the applicant's previous addresses 9within the 10 years prior to the license application and any 10information related to violations of this Act. No law 11enforcement agency, State's Attorney, Attorney General, or 12member or staff of the judiciary shall provide any information 13to a requester who is not entitled to it by law.14    (j) No later than 10 days after receipt of a completed 15application, the Illinois State Police shall enter the 16relevant information about the applicant into the database 17under subsection (i) of this Section which is accessible by 18law enforcement agencies.19    (k) The Illinois State Police shall continuously monitor 20relevant State and federal databases for firearms prohibitors 21and correlate those records with concealed carry license 22holders to ensure compliance with this Act, or State and 23federal law. The Illinois State Police may adopt rules to 24implement this subsection. 25(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)   SB1458- 7 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    (430 ILCS 66/70)2    Sec. 70. Violations. 3    (a) A license issued or renewed under this Act shall be 4revoked if, at any time, the licensee is found to be ineligible 5for a license under this Act or the licensee no longer meets 6the eligibility requirements of the Firearm Owners 7Identification Card Act.8    (b) A license shall be suspended if an order of 9protection, including an emergency order of protection, 10plenary order of protection, or interim order of protection 11under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 or 12under the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, or if a 13firearms restraining order, including an emergency firearms 14restraining order, under the Firearms Restraining Order Act, 15is issued against a licensee for the duration of the order, or 16if the Illinois State Police is made aware of a similar order 17issued against the licensee in any other jurisdiction. If an 18order of protection is issued against a licensee, the licensee 19shall surrender the license, as applicable, to the court at 20the time the order is entered or to the law enforcement agency 21or entity serving process at the time the licensee is served 22the order. The court, law enforcement agency, or entity 23responsible for serving the order of protection shall notify 24the Illinois State Police within 7 days and transmit the 25license to the Illinois State Police.  SB1458- 8 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    (c) A license is invalid upon expiration of the license, 2unless the licensee has submitted an application to renew the 3license, and the applicant is otherwise eligible to possess a 4license under this Act.5    (d) A licensee shall not carry a concealed firearm while 6under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 7intoxicating compound or combination of compounds, or any 8combination thereof, under the standards set forth in 9subsection (a) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.10    A licensee in violation of this subsection (d) shall be 11guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first or second violation 12and a Class 4 felony for a third violation. The Illinois State 13Police may suspend a license for up to 6 months for a second 14violation and shall permanently revoke a license for a third 15violation.16    (e) Except as otherwise provided, a licensee in violation 17of this Act shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. A second 18or subsequent violation is a Class A misdemeanor. The Illinois 19State Police may suspend a license for up to 6 months for a 20second violation and shall permanently revoke a license for 3 21or more violations of Section 65 of this Act. Any person 22convicted of a violation under this Section shall pay a $150 23fee to be deposited into the Mental Health Reporting Fund, 24plus any applicable court costs or fees.25    (f) A licensee convicted or found guilty of a violation of 26this Act who has a valid license and is otherwise eligible to   SB1458- 9 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1carry a concealed firearm shall only be subject to the 2penalties under this Section and shall not be subject to the 3penalties under Section 21-6, paragraph (4), (8), or (10) of 4subsection (a) of Section 24-1, or subparagraph (A-5) or (B-5) 5of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1.6 of the 6Criminal Code of 2012. Except as otherwise provided in this 7subsection, nothing in this subsection prohibits the licensee 8from being subjected to penalties for violations other than 9those specified in this Act.10    (g) A licensee whose license is revoked, suspended, or 11denied shall, within 48 hours of receiving notice of the 12revocation, suspension, or denial, surrender his or her 13concealed carry license to the local law enforcement agency 14where the person resides. The local law enforcement agency 15shall provide the licensee a receipt and transmit the 16concealed carry license to the Illinois State Police. If the 17licensee whose concealed carry license has been revoked, 18suspended, or denied fails to comply with the requirements of 19this subsection, the law enforcement agency where the person 20resides may petition the circuit court to issue a warrant to 21search for and seize the concealed carry license in the 22possession and under the custody or control of the licensee 23whose concealed carry license has been revoked, suspended, or 24denied. The observation of a concealed carry license in the 25possession of a person whose license has been revoked, 26suspended, or denied constitutes a sufficient basis for the   SB1458- 10 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1arrest of that person for violation of this subsection. A 2violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.3    (h) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h-5), a 4license issued or renewed under this Act shall be revoked if, 5at any time, the licensee is found ineligible for a Firearm 6Owner's Identification Card, or the licensee no longer 7possesses a valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If the 8Firearm Owner's Identification Card is expired or suspended 9rather than denied or revoked, the license may be suspended 10for a period of up to one year to allow the licensee to 11reinstate his or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. The 12Illinois State Police shall adopt rules to enforce this 13subsection. A licensee whose license is revoked under this 14subsection (h) shall surrender his or her concealed carry 15license as provided for in subsection (g) of this Section. 16    This subsection shall not apply to a person who has filed 17an application with the Illinois State Police for renewal of a 18Firearm Owner's Identification Card and who is not otherwise 19ineligible to obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card.20    (h-5) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 21licensee under this Act expires during the term of the license 22issued under this Act, the license and the Firearm Owner's 23Identification Card remain valid, and the Illinois State 24Police may automatically renew the licensee's Firearm Owner's 25Identification Card as provided in subsection (c) of Section 5 26of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.  SB1458- 11 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    (i) A certified firearms instructor who knowingly provides 2or offers to provide a false certification that an applicant 3has completed firearms training as required under this Act is 4guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. A person guilty of a violation 5of this subsection (i) is not eligible for court supervision. 6The Illinois State Police shall permanently revoke the 7firearms instructor certification of a person convicted under 8this subsection (i). 9    (j) When leaving his or her vehicle unattended, a licensee 10shall store his or her loaded or unloaded firearm out of plain 11view in a safe or other secure container which, when locked, is 12incapable of being opened without the key, keypad, 13combination, or other unlocking mechanism and is capable of 14preventing an unauthorized person from obtaining access to and 15possession of the weapon contained therein and shall be fire, 16impact, and tamper resistant. For the purposes of this 17subsection, a glove compartment, glove box, or center console 18is not considered an appropriate safe or secure storage 19container. A licensee in violation of this subsection (j) is 20guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first or second violation 21and a Class 4 felony for a third violation. The Illinois State 22Police may suspend a license for up to 6 months for a second 23violation and shall permanently revoke a license for a third 24violation. 25(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)   SB1458- 12 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 2changing Section 24-1.6 as follows: 3    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.6)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-822)5    Sec. 24-1.6. Aggravated unlawful use of a weapon. 6    (a) A person commits the offense of aggravated unlawful 7use of a weapon when he or she knowingly:8        (1) Carries on or about his or her person or in any 9    vehicle or concealed on or about his or her person except 10    when on his or her land or in his or her abode, legal 11    dwelling, or fixed place of business, or on the land or in 12    the legal dwelling of another person as an invitee with 13    that person's permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun 14    or taser or other firearm; or15        (2) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 16    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 17    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village or 18    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 19    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 20    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his or 21    her own land or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or 22    fixed place of business, or on the land or in the legal 23    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 24    person's permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun or   SB1458- 13 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    taser or other firearm; and2        (3) One of the following factors is present:3            (A) the firearm, other than a pistol, revolver, or 4        handgun, possessed was uncased, loaded, and 5        immediately accessible at the time of the offense; or6            (A-5) the pistol, revolver, or handgun possessed 7        was uncased, loaded, and immediately accessible at the 8        time of the offense and the person possessing the 9        pistol, revolver, or handgun has not been issued a 10        currently valid license under the Firearm Concealed 11        Carry Act; or 12            (B) the firearm, other than a pistol, revolver, or 13        handgun, possessed was uncased, unloaded, and the 14        ammunition for the weapon was immediately accessible 15        at the time of the offense; or16            (B-5) the pistol, revolver, or handgun possessed 17        was uncased, unloaded, and the ammunition for the 18        weapon was immediately accessible at the time of the 19        offense and the person possessing the pistol, 20        revolver, or handgun has not been issued a currently 21        valid license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act; 22        or 23            (C) the person possessing the firearm has not been 24        issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 25        Identification Card; or26            (D) the person possessing the weapon was   SB1458- 14 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1        previously adjudicated a delinquent minor under the 2        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for an act that if committed 3        by an adult would be a felony; or4            (E) the person possessing the weapon was engaged 5        in a misdemeanor violation of the Cannabis Control 6        Act, in a misdemeanor violation of the Illinois 7        Controlled Substances Act, or in a misdemeanor 8        violation of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 9        Protection Act; or10            (F) (blank); or11            (G) the person possessing the weapon had an order 12        of protection issued against him or her within the 13        previous 2 years; or14            (H) the person possessing the weapon was engaged 15        in the commission or attempted commission of a 16        misdemeanor involving the use or threat of violence 17        against the person or property of another; or18            (I) the person possessing the weapon was under 21 19        years of age and in possession of a handgun, unless the 20        person under 21 is engaged in lawful activities under 21        the Wildlife Code or described in subsection 22        24-2(b)(1), (b)(3), or 24-2(f).23    (a-5) "Handgun" as used in this Section has the meaning 24given to it in Section 5 of the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 25    (b) "Stun gun or taser" as used in this Section has the 26same definition given to it in Section 24-1 of this Code.  SB1458- 15 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    (c) This Section does not apply to or affect the 2transportation or possession of weapons that:3        (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or4        (ii) are not immediately accessible; or5        (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 6    carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a person 7    who has been issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 8    Identification Card.9    (d) Sentence.10        (1) Aggravated unlawful use of a weapon is a Class 4 11    felony; a second or subsequent offense is a Class 2 felony 12    for which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 13    imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 14    years, except as provided for in Section 5-4.5-110 of the 15    Unified Code of Corrections. 16        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and 17    (4) of this subsection (d), a first offense of aggravated 18    unlawful use of a weapon committed with a firearm by a 19    person 18 years of age or older where the factors listed in 20    both items (A) and (C) or both items (A-5) and (C) of 21    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) are present is a Class 4 22    felony, for which the person shall be sentenced to a term 23    of imprisonment of not less than one year and not more than 24    3 years.25        (3) Aggravated unlawful use of a weapon by a person 26    who has been previously convicted of a felony in this   SB1458- 16 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    State or another jurisdiction is a Class 2 felony for 2    which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 3    imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 4    years, except as provided for in Section 5-4.5-110 of the 5    Unified Code of Corrections. 6        (4) Aggravated unlawful use of a weapon while wearing 7    or in possession of body armor as defined in Section 33F-1 8    by a person who has not been issued a valid Firearms 9    Owner's Identification Card in accordance with Section 5 10    of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is a Class X 11    felony. 12    (e) The possession of each firearm in violation of this 13Section constitutes a single and separate violation.14(Source: P.A. 100-3, eff. 1-1-18; 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-822)16    Sec. 24-1.6. Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon. 17    (a) A person commits the offense of aggravated unlawful 18possession of a weapon when he or she knowingly:19        (1) Carries on or about his or her person or in any 20    vehicle or concealed on or about his or her person except 21    when on his or her land or in his or her abode, legal 22    dwelling, or fixed place of business, or on the land or in 23    the legal dwelling of another person as an invitee with 24    that person's permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun 25    or taser or other firearm; or  SB1458- 17 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1        (2) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 2    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 3    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village or 4    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 5    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 6    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his or 7    her own land or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or 8    fixed place of business, or on the land or in the legal 9    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 10    person's permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun or 11    taser or other firearm; and12        (3) One of the following factors is present:13            (A) the firearm, other than a pistol, revolver, or 14        handgun, possessed was uncased, loaded, and 15        immediately accessible at the time of the offense; or16            (A-5) the pistol, revolver, or handgun possessed 17        was uncased, loaded, and immediately accessible at the 18        time of the offense and the person possessing the 19        pistol, revolver, or handgun has not been issued a 20        currently valid license under the Firearm Concealed 21        Carry Act; or 22            (B) the firearm, other than a pistol, revolver, or 23        handgun, possessed was uncased, unloaded, and the 24        ammunition for the weapon was immediately accessible 25        at the time of the offense; or26            (B-5) the pistol, revolver, or handgun possessed   SB1458- 18 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1        was uncased, unloaded, and the ammunition for the 2        weapon was immediately accessible at the time of the 3        offense and the person possessing the pistol, 4        revolver, or handgun has not been issued a currently 5        valid license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act; 6        or 7            (C) the person possessing the firearm has not been 8        issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 9        Identification Card; or10            (D) the person possessing the weapon was 11        previously adjudicated a delinquent minor under the 12        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for an act that if committed 13        by an adult would be a felony; or14            (E) the person possessing the weapon was engaged 15        in a misdemeanor violation of the Cannabis Control 16        Act, in a misdemeanor violation of the Illinois 17        Controlled Substances Act, or in a misdemeanor 18        violation of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 19        Protection Act; or20            (F) (blank); or21            (G) the person possessing the weapon had an order 22        of protection issued against him or her within the 23        previous 2 years; or24            (H) the person possessing the weapon was engaged 25        in the commission or attempted commission of a 26        misdemeanor involving the use or threat of violence   SB1458- 19 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1        against the person or property of another; or2            (I) the person possessing the weapon was under 21 3        years of age and in possession of a handgun, unless the 4        person under 21 is engaged in lawful activities under 5        the Wildlife Code or described in subsection 6        24-2(b)(1), (b)(3), or 24-2(f).7    (a-1) For purposes of subsection (a), "case" does not 8include an unlocked glove compartment, glove box, or center 9console of a vehicle. 10    (a-5) "Handgun" as used in this Section has the meaning 11given to it in Section 5 of the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 12    (b) "Stun gun or taser" as used in this Section has the 13same definition given to it in Section 24-1 of this Code.14    (c) This Section does not apply to or affect the 15transportation or possession of weapons that:16        (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or17        (ii) are not immediately accessible; or18        (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 19    carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a person 20    who has been issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 21    Identification Card.22    (d) Sentence.23        (1) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon is a 24    Class 4 felony; a second or subsequent offense is a Class 2 25    felony for which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 26    imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7   SB1458- 20 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1    years, except as provided for in Section 5-4.5-110 of the 2    Unified Code of Corrections. 3        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and 4    (4) of this subsection (d), a first offense of aggravated 5    unlawful possession of a weapon committed with a firearm 6    by a person 18 years of age or older where the factors 7    listed in both items (A) and (C) or both items (A-5) and 8    (C) of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) are present is a 9    Class 4 felony, for which the person shall be sentenced to 10    a term of imprisonment of not less than one year and not 11    more than 3 years.12        (3) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon by a 13    person who has been previously convicted of a felony in 14    this State or another jurisdiction is a Class 2 felony for 15    which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 16    imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 17    years, except as provided for in Section 5-4.5-110 of the 18    Unified Code of Corrections. 19        (4) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon while 20    wearing or in possession of body armor as defined in 21    Section 33F-1 by a person who has not been issued a valid 22    Firearms Owner's Identification Card in accordance with 23    Section 5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 24    a Class X felony. 25    (e) The possession of each firearm in violation of this 26Section constitutes a single and separate violation.  SB1458- 21 -LRB104 02899 RLC 12909 b1(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 3changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 4that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 5represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 6not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 7made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 8Public Act.